Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201454-1160.01
Brand inspection.

The owner
or operator of any livestock auction market located in any county outside
the brand inspection area created in section 54-1,109 may voluntarily elect
to provide brand inspection as provided in sections 54-1,129 to 54-1,131.

Laws 2014, LB884, § 23.
July 18, 2014